test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - O - waaboos :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     waaboos+NA: waabooz
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+waaboos+NA: nwaabooz
     2+waaboos+NA: gwaabooz
     X+waaboos+NA: waabooz
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     waaboos+NA+Con: waaboozoonh
     waaboos+NA+Dim: waaboozoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     waaboos+NA+Pej: waaboozosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     waaboos+NA+Prt: waaboozba
     waaboos+NA+Voc+Pl: waaboozdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     waaboos+NA+4: waaboozoon
     waaboos+NA+Loc: waaboozong
     waaboos+NA+Pl: waaboozoog
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+waaboos+NA+Con: nwaaboozoonh
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim: nwaaboozoons
     2+waaboos+NA+Con: gwaaboozoonh
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim: gwaaboozoons
     X+waaboos+NA+Con: waaboozoonh
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim: waaboozoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos: nwaaboozom
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos: gwaaboozom
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos: waaboozom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej: nwaaboozosh
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej: gwaaboozosh
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej: waaboozosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl: nwaabooznaa
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl: gwaabooznaa
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl: gwaaboozwaa
     3+waaboos+NA+3+4: waaboozni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Prt: nwaaboozba
     1+waaboos+NA+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozdig
     2+waaboos+NA+Prt: gwaaboozba
     2+waaboos+NA+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozdig
     X+waaboos+NA+Prt: waaboozba
     X+waaboos+NA+Voc+Pl: waaboozdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+4: nwaaboozoon
     1+waaboos+NA+Loc: nwaaboozong
     1+waaboos+NA+Pl: nwaaboozoog
     2+waaboos+NA+4: gwaaboozoon
     2+waaboos+NA+Loc: gwaaboozong
     2+waaboos+NA+Pl: gwaaboozoog
     3+waaboos+NA+4: waaboozoon
     3+waaboos+NA+Loc: waaboozong
     X+waaboos+NA+4: waaboozoon
     X+waaboos+NA+Loc: waaboozong
     X+waaboos+NA+Pl: waaboozoog
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     waaboos+NA+Con+Pej: waaboozoonyish
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej: waaboozoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     waaboos+NA+Con+Prt: waaboozoonyba
     waaboos+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonydig
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt: waaboozoonsba
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     waaboos+NA+Con+4: waaboozoonyin
     waaboos+NA+Con+Loc: waaboozoonying
     waaboos+NA+Con+Pl: waaboozoonyig
     waaboos+NA+Dim+4: waaboozoonsan
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Loc: waaboozoonsing
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Pl: waaboozoonsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt: waaboozshiba
     waaboos+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     waaboos+NA+Pej+4: waaboozshan
     waaboos+NA+Pej+Loc: waaboozshing
     waaboos+NA+Pej+Pl: waaboozshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     waaboos+NA+Prt+4: waaboozbaniin
     waaboos+NA+Prt+Loc: waaboozbaniing
     waaboos+NA+Prt+Pl: waaboozbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos: nwaaboozoonyim
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos: nwaaboozoonsim
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos: gwaaboozoonyim
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gwaaboozoonsim
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos: waaboozoonyim
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos: waaboozoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej: nwaaboozoonyish
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej: nwaaboozoonsish
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej: gwaaboozoonyish
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej: gwaaboozoonsish
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej: waaboozoonyish
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej: waaboozoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl: nwaaboozoonynaa
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl: nwaaboozoonsnaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+1+Pl: gwaaboozoonynaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+2+Pl: gwaaboozoonywaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gwaaboozoonsnaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl: gwaaboozoonswaa
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+3+4: waaboozoonyni
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+3+4: waaboozoonsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt: nwaaboozoonyba
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonydig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt: nwaaboozoonsba
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonsdig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt: gwaaboozoonyba
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonydig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt: gwaaboozoonsba
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonsdig
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Prt: waaboozoonyba
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonydig
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt: waaboozoonsba
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+4: nwaaboozoonyin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Loc: nwaaboozoonying
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pl: nwaaboozoonyig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+4: nwaaboozoonsan
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Loc: nwaaboozoonsing
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pl: nwaaboozoonsag
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+4: gwaaboozoonyin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Loc: gwaaboozoonying
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pl: gwaaboozoonyig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+4: gwaaboozoonsan
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Loc: gwaaboozoonsing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pl: gwaaboozoonsag
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+4: waaboozoonyin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Loc: waaboozoonying
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+4: waaboozoonsan
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Loc: waaboozoonsing
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+4: waaboozoonyin
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Loc: waaboozoonying
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+Pl: waaboozoonyig
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+4: waaboozoonsan
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Loc: waaboozoonsing
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pl: waaboozoonsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej: nwaaboozmish
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gwaaboozmish
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej: waaboozmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: nwaaboozminaa
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: gwaaboozminaa
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: gwaaboozmiwaa
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+3+4: waaboozmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt: nwaaboozmiba
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozmidig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gwaaboozmiba
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozmidig
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Prt: waaboozmiba
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: waaboozmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+4: nwaaboozman
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Loc: nwaaboozming
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pl: nwaaboozmag
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+4: gwaaboozman
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gwaaboozming
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gwaaboozmag
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+4: waaboozman
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Loc: waaboozming
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+4: waaboozman
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Loc: waaboozming
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pl: waaboozmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl: nwaaboozshinaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gwaaboozshinaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl: gwaaboozshiwaa
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+3+4: waaboozshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt: nwaaboozshiba
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozshidig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt: gwaaboozshiba
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozshidig
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt: waaboozshiba
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+4: nwaaboozshan
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+Loc: nwaaboozshing
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+Pl: nwaaboozshag
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+4: gwaaboozshan
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+Loc: gwaaboozshing
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+Pl: gwaaboozshag
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+4: waaboozshan
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+Loc: waaboozshing
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+4: waaboozshan
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+Loc: waaboozshing
     X+waaboos+NA+Pej+Pl: waaboozshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabooznaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaabooznaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabooznaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaabooznaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozwaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozwaadig
     3+waaboos+NA+3+4+Prt: waaboozniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+4: nwaabooznaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Loc: nwaabooznaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Pl: nwaabooznaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+4: gwaabooznaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gwaabooznaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gwaabooznaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozwaan
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozwaang
     2+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozwaag
     3+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+4: waaboozwaan
     3+waaboos+NA+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozwaang
     3+waaboos+NA+3+4+4: waaboozniwan
     3+waaboos+NA+3+4+Loc: waaboozniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Prt+4: nwaaboozbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Prt+4: gwaaboozbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozbaniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Prt+4: waaboozbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Prt+Loc: waaboozbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Prt+4: waaboozbaniin
     X+waaboos+NA+Prt+Loc: waaboozbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Prt+Pl: waaboozbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: waaboozoonyshiba
     waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonyshidig
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: waaboozoonsshiba
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+4: waaboozoonyshan
     waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonyshing
     waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: waaboozoonyshag
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+4: waaboozoonsshan
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonsshing
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: waaboozoonsshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+4: waaboozoonybaniin
     waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonybaniing
     waaboos+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonybaniig
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+4: waaboozoonsbaniin
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsbaniing
     waaboos+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonsbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozshibniin
     waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozshibniing
     waaboos+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: waaboozshibniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: nwaaboozoonymish
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: nwaaboozoonsmish
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gwaaboozoonymish
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gwaaboozoonsmish
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: waaboozoonymish
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: waaboozoonsmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: nwaaboozoonyminaa
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: nwaaboozoonsminaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gwaaboozoonyminaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gwaaboozoonymiwaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gwaaboozoonsminaa
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmiwaa
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: waaboozoonymini
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: waaboozoonsmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: nwaaboozoonymiba
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonymidig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: nwaaboozoonsmiba
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonsmidig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gwaaboozoonymiba
